Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-627.04
Financial transaction offense; order of forfeiture.

In addition to the existing penalties available for a violation of sections 28-618 to 28-630, a sentencing court may order forfeiture as provided in sections 28-1601 to 28-1603.

Laws 2025, LB559, § 6.